Utah statutes.
26-2-25.   Divorce or adoption -- Duty of court clerk to file certificates or reports.

(1) (a)  For each adoption, annulment of adoption, divorce, and annulment of marriage ordered or decreed in this state, the clerk of the court shall prepare a divorce certificate or report of adoption on a form furnished by the state registrar.  The petitioner shall provide the information necessary to prepare the certificate or report when he files the petition with the clerk.

(b)  The clerk shall prepare the certificate or report and, immediately after the decree or order becomes final, shall complete the remaining entries.  On or before the 15th day of each month, the clerk shall forward the divorce certificates and reports of adoption completed by him during the preceding month to the state registrar.

(2)  If there is filed with the clerk of the court in an adoption proceeding a written consent to adoption by an agency licensed under the laws of the state to receive children for placement or adoption, the agency by its authorized representative shall prepare and complete the report of adoption and forward it to the state registrar immediately after entry of the decree of adoption.



Amended by Chapter 202, 1995 General Session

